Utah statutes.
17-33-2.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Career service position" means any position in the county service except those exempted under Section 17-33-8.

(2)  "Council" means the career service council, a three-member appeals and personnel advisory board.

(3)  "Director" means the director of personnel management.

(4)  "Eligible applicant" means any applicant that meets the job related minimum requirements established for a position in the career service.

(5)  "Eligible list" means a list of eligible applicants ranked in order of relative knowledge, skill, ability and merit.

(6)  "Exempt positions" means those positions which are not in the career service as specified in Section 17-33-8.

(7)  "Merit system" means a system of personnel administration based on the principles set forth in Section 17-33-3.

(8)  "Position classification" means a grouping of positions under the same title which are sufficiently similar to be compensated at the same salary range and to which the same tests of ability can be applied.

(9)  "Provisional appointment" means an appointment to fill a position pending the establishment of a register for such position.

